Rhode Island, session 2025, SB542.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 21-28-4.01, 21-28-4.01.1, 21-28-4.01.2, 21-28-4.02, 21-28-4.03,
21-28-4.05, 21-28-4.06, 21-28-4.09, 21-28-4.11, 21-28-4.13, 21-28-4.14, 21-28-4.15, and 21-28-
4.18 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28 entitled “Uniform Controlled Substances Act – Offenses
and Penalties” are hereby amended to read as follows
21-28-4.01. Prohibited acts A — Penalties.
(a)(1) Except as authorized by this chapter and chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of title 21, it shall
be unlawful for any person to manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver
a controlled substance.
(2) Any person who is not a drug-addicted person, as defined in § 21-28-1.02, who violates
this subsection with respect to a controlled substance classified in schedule I or II, except the
substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned to
a term up to life or fined not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) nor less than for
not more than ten (10) years or fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.
(3) Where the deliverance as prohibited in this subsection shall be the proximate cause of
death to the person to whom the controlled substance is delivered, it shall not be a defense that the
person delivering the substance was, at the time of delivery, a drug-addicted person as defined in §
21-28-1.02.
(4) Any person, except as provided for in subsection (a)(2), who violates this subsection

with respect to:
(i) A controlled substance, classified in schedule I or II, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) five (5) years, or fined not more than
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) nor less than three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both;
(ii) A controlled substance, classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) five (5) years, or fined not more than
forty thousand dollars ($40,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both; provided, with respect to
a controlled substance classified in schedule III(d), upon conviction may be imprisoned for not
more than five (5) three (3) years, or fined not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) five
thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(iii) A controlled substance, classified in schedule V, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year six (6) months, or fined not more than
ten thousand dollars ($10,000) three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.
(b)(1) Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to create, deliver,
or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance.
(2) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule I or II, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) five (5) years, or fined not more than
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both;
(ii) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) five (5) years, or fined not more than
forty thousand dollars ($40,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both; provided, with respect to
a controlled substance classified in schedule III(d), upon conviction may be imprisoned for not
more than five (5) two (2) years, or fined not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) three
thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.
(iii) A counterfeit substance, classified in schedule V, is guilty of a crime and, upon
conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year six (6) months, or fined not more than
ten thousand dollars ($10,000) three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.
(c)(1) It shall be unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally to possess a controlled
substance, unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or
order of a practitioner while acting in the course of his or her professional practice, or except as
otherwise authorized by this chapter or chapters 28.6 and 28.11 of title 21.
(2) Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:
(i) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, ten grams (10 g.) or
LC000597 - Page 2 of 16

less of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of a controlled substance classified
in schedules I, II, III, IV, and V, except buprenorphine and the substance classified as marijuana,
is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than two (2)
years six (6) months, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or both.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, more than ten grams
(10 g.), but less than one ounce (1 oz.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
a controlled substance classified in schedules I, II and III, IV, and V, except buprenorphine and the
substance classified as marijuana, is guilty of a felony misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be
imprisoned for not more than three (3) years three hundred sixty-four days (364), or fined not more
than five thousand dollars ($5,000) two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or both.
(iii) Except as otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, more than two
ounces (2 oz.) or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate of a controlled
substance classified in schedule I as marijuana is guilty of a misdemeanor unless possessed inside
one’s own primary residence, except for those persons subject to (a)(1), and, upon conviction, may
be imprisoned for not more than one year six (6) months, or fined not more than five hundred
dollars ($500), or both. Exclusive of live marijuana plants, more than ten ounces (10 oz.) of a
controlled substance classified in schedule I as marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of
cannabis concentrate, when possessed within one’s personal residence is guilty of a misdemeanor,
except for those persons subject to (a)(1), and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more
than one year six (6) months, or fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five
hundred dollars ($500), or both.
Possession of live marijuana plants in excess of the number authorized pursuant to § 21-
28.11-22 but less than twenty-five (25) marijuana plants is guilty of a misdemeanor, except for
those persons subject to (a)(1) and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than one year
six (6) months, or fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars
($500), or both.
Possession of twenty-five (25) or more live marijuana plants is guilty of a felony
misdemeanor, except for those persons subject to (a)(1), and upon conviction, may be imprisoned
for not more than three (3) years three hundred sixty-four (364) days or fined not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or both.
(iv) Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, and except as
otherwise provided in §§ 21-28-4.01.1 and 21-28-4.01.2, the possession of more than one ounce (1
oz.) but not more than two ounces (2 oz.) of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of
cannabis concentrate by a person who is at least twenty-one (21) years old, and who is not exempted
LC000597 - Page 3 of 16

from penalties pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title, shall constitute a civil offense, rendering the
offender liable to a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) one hundred
dollars ($100) and forfeiture of the marijuana, but not to any other form of criminal or civil
punishment or disqualification. Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary,
this civil penalty of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) one hundred dollars ($100) and forfeiture of
the marijuana shall apply if the offense is the first (1st) or second (2nd) violation within the previous
eighteen (18) months.
(v) Notwithstanding any public, special, or general law to the contrary, possession of two
ounces (2 oz.) or less of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate by
a person between seventeen (17) and twenty (20) years old, and who is not exempted from penalties
pursuant to chapter 28.6 of this title, shall constitute a civil offense, rendering the offender liable to
a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) one hundred dollars ($100) and
forfeiture of the marijuana; provided the minor offender completes an approved, drug-awareness
program and community service as determined by the court. If the person seventeen (17) years of
age or older and under the age of eighteen (18) years fails to complete an approved, drug-awareness
program and community service within one year of the disposition, the penalty shall be a three
hundred dollar ($300) two hundred dollar ($200) civil fine and forfeiture of the marijuana, except
that if no drug-awareness program or community service is available, the penalty shall be a fine of
one hundred fifty dollars ($150) one hundred dollars ($100) and forfeiture of the marijuana. The
parents or legal guardian of any offender seventeen (17) years of age or older and under the age of
eighteen (18) shall be notified of the offense and the availability of a drug-awareness and
community-service program. The drug-awareness program must be approved by the court, but
shall, at a minimum, provide four (4) hours of instruction or group discussion and ten (10) hours of
community service. Notwithstanding any other public, special, or general law to the contrary, this
civil penalty shall apply if the offense is the first or second violation within the previous eighteen
(18) months.
(vi) [Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 31, § 10 and P.L. 2022, ch. 32, § 10.]
(vii) Any unpaid civil fine issued under (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) shall double to three hundred
dollars ($300) two hundred dollars ($200) if not paid within thirty (30) days of the disposition. The
civil fine shall double again to six hundred dollars ($600) four hundred dollars ($400) if it has not
been paid within ninety (90) days.
(viii) No person may be arrested for a violation of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) of this subsection
except as provided in this subparagraph. Any person in possession of an identification card, license,
or other form of identification issued by the state or any state, city, or town, or any college or
LC000597 - Page 4 of 16

university, who fails to produce the same upon request of a police officer who informs the person
that he or she has been found in possession of what appears to the officer to be more than one ounce
(1 oz.) of marijuana, or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate or any person
without any such forms of identification who fails or refuses to truthfully provide his or her name,
address, and date of birth to a police officer who has informed such person that the officer intends
to provide such individual with a citation for possession of more than one ounce (1 oz.) but less
than two ounces (2 oz.) of marijuana or the equivalent amount in the form of cannabis concentrate,
may be arrested.
(ix) No violation of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) of this subsection shall be considered a violation
of parole or probation.
(x) Any records collected by any state agency, tribunal, or the family court that include
personally identifiable information about violations of (c)(2)(iv) or (c)(2)(v) shall not be open to
public inspection in accordance with § 8-8.2-21.
(3) Jurisdiction.
(i) Any and all adjudications of violations of (c)(2)(i) shall be within the original
jurisdiction of the Rhode Island superior court. The department of attorney general shall prosecute
any and all violations of (c)(2)(i).
(ii) Any and all violations of (c)(2)(iv) and (c)(2)(v) shall be the exclusive jurisdiction of
the Rhode Island traffic tribunal. All money associated with the civil fine issued under (c)(2)(iv) or
(c)(2)(v) shall be payable to the Rhode Island traffic tribunal. Fifty percent (50%) of all fines
collected by the Rhode Island traffic tribunal from civil penalties issued pursuant to (c)(2)(iv) or
(c)(2)(v) shall be expended on drug-awareness and treatment programs for youth.
(4) Additionally, every person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere under (c)(2)(i) or
(c)(2)(ii) or convicted or who pleads nolo contendere a second or subsequent time under (c)(2)(iii),
who is not sentenced to a term of imprisonment to serve for the offense, shall be required to:
(i) Perform up to one hundred (100) hours of community service;
(ii) Attend and complete a drug-counseling and education program, as prescribed, by the
director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals
(BHDDH) similar to that in § 21-28.11-27.2, and pay the sum of four hundred dollars ($400) to
help defray the costs of this program which shall be deposited as general revenues. Failure to attend
may result, after hearing by the court, in jail sentence up to one year;
(iii) The court shall not suspend any part or all of the imposition of the fee required by this
subsection, unless the court finds an inability to pay;
(iv) If the offense involves the use of any automobile to transport the substance or the
LC000597 - Page 5 of 16

substance is found within an automobile, then a person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere
under (c)(2)(i), (c)(2)(ii) or (c)(2)(iii) shall be subject to a loss of license for a period of six (6)
months for a first offense and one year for each offense after.
(5) All fees assessed and collected pursuant to (c)(2)(iii) shall be deposited as general
revenues and shall be collected from the person convicted or who pleads nolo contendere before
any other fines authorized by this chapter.
(d) It shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture, distribute, or possess with intent to
manufacture or distribute, an imitation controlled substance. Any person who violates this
subsection is guilty of a crime and, upon conviction, shall be subject to the same term of
imprisonment and/or fine as provided by this chapter for the manufacture or distribution of the
controlled substance that the particular imitation controlled substance forming the basis of the
prosecution was designed to resemble and/or represented to be; but in no case shall the
imprisonment be for more than five (5) years nor the fine for more than twenty thousand dollars
($20,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(e) It shall be unlawful for a practitioner to prescribe, order, distribute, supply, or sell an
anabolic steroid or human growth hormone for: (1) Enhancing performance in an exercise, sport,
or game, or (2) Hormonal manipulation intended to increase muscle mass, strength, or weight
without a medical necessity. Any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor
and, upon conviction, may be imprisoned for not more than six (6) months or a fine of not more
than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(f) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly or intentionally possess, manufacture,
distribute, or possess with intent to manufacture or distribute, any extract, compound, salt
derivative, or mixture of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium or its extracts unless the person is
exempt pursuant to the provisions of § 21-28-3.30. Notwithstanding any laws to the contrary, any
person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be
imprisoned for not more than one year six (6) months, or fined not more than one thousand dollars
($1,000) five hundred dollars ($500), or both. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
licensed physicians, pharmacists, and accredited hospitals and teaching facilities engaged in the
research or study of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium and shall not apply to any person
participating in clinical trials involving the use of salvia divinorum or datura stramonium.
21-28-4.01.1. Certain quantities of controlled substances.
(a) Except as authorized by this chapter, it shall be unlawful for any person to manufacture,
sell, or possess with intent to manufacture or sell, a controlled substance classified in schedule I or
II (excluding marijuana) or to possess or deliver the following enumerated quantities of certain
LC000597 - Page 6 of 16

controlled substances:
(1) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of heroin;
(2) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of:
(i) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine,
ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed;
(ii) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(iii) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
(iv) Any compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of any of the
substances referred to in paragraphs (i) — (iii) of this subdivision;
(3) One gram (1 g.) to ten grams (10 gs.) of phencyclidine (PCP) or one hundred (100) to
one thousand (1,000) tablets of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of
phencyclidine (PCP);
(4) One-tenth of a gram (0.1 g.) to one gram (1 g.) of lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD) or
one hundred (100) to one thousand (1,000) tablets of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD);
(5) One kilogram (1 kg.) to five kilograms (5 kgs.) of a mixture containing a detectable
amount of marijuana;
(6) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of synthetic drugs; or
(7) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of fentanyl or its analogs, including, but not limited to: N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-
4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers
(acetyl fentanyl); N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2carboxamide (furanyl fentanyl);
and N-Phenethyl-4-piperidinone (4-AN-PP); or
(8) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a
detectable amount of carfentanil; or
(9) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of 3,4-methyl-enedioxymethamphetamine
(MDMA), its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; or
(10) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers,
and salts of its optical isomers; or
(11) One ounce (1 oz.) to one kilogram (1 kg.) of methamphetamine, its salts, and salts of
its isomers.
LC000597 - Page 7 of 16

(b) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction,
may be imprisoned for a term up to fifty (50) ten (10) years and fined not more than five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
21-28-4.01.2. Certain quantities of controlled substances.
(a) Except as authorized by the chapter, it shall be unlawful for any person to possess,
manufacture, sell, or deliver the following enumerated quantities of certain controlled substances:
(1) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of heroin;
(2) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of:
(i) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine,
ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed;
(ii) Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;
(iii) Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or
(iv) Any compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of any of the
substances referred to in paragraphs (i) — (iii) of this subdivision;
(3) More than ten grams (10 gs.) of phencyclidine (PCP) or more than one thousand (1,000)
tablets of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of phencyclidine (PCP);
(4) More than one gram (1 g.) of lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD); or more than one
thousand (1,000) tablets of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid
diethylamide (LSD);
(5) More than five kilograms (5 kgs.) of a mixture containing a detectable amount of
marijuana;
(6) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of synthetic drugs; or
(7) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of fentanyl or its analogs, including, but not limited to: N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-
phenylacetamide, its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers (acetyl
fentanyl); N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2carboxamide (furanyl fentanyl); and N-
Phenethyl-4-piperidinone (4-AN-PP); or
(8) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of a mixture or substance containing a detectable
amount of carfentanil; or
(9) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of 3,4-methyl-enedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA),
its optical, positional, and geometric isomers, salts, and salts of isomers; or
LC000597 - Page 8 of 16

(10) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of amphetamine, its salts, optical isomers, and salts of
its optical isomers; or
(11) More than one kilogram (1 kg.) of methamphetamine, its salts, and salts of its isomers.
(b) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a crime, and upon conviction,
may be imprisoned for a term up to life ten (10) years and fined not more than one million twenty
thousand dollars ($1,000,000) ($20,000).
21-28-4.02. Prohibited acts B — Penalties.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person:
(1) Who is subject to article III to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation
of § 21-28-3.18;
(2) Who is a registrant to manufacture a controlled substance not authorized by his or her
registration, or to distribute or dispense a controlled substance not authorized by his or her
registration to another registrant or other authorized person;
(3) To refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish any record, notification, order form,
statement, invoice or information required under this chapter;
(4) To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection authorized by this chapter.
(b) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than five (5) two (2) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000) two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both.
21-28-4.03. Prohibited acts C — Penalties.
(a) It is unlawful for any person knowingly or intentionally:
(1) To distribute as a registrant a controlled substance, except pursuant to an order form as
required by § 21-28-3.10;
(2) To use in the course of the manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance a
registration number, which is fictitious, revoked, suspended, or issued to another person;
(3) To acquire or obtain possession of a controlled substance by misrepresentation, fraud,
forgery, deception, or subterfuge;
(4) To furnish false or fraudulent material information in, or omit any material information
from, any application, report, or other document required to be kept or filed under this chapter or
any record required to be kept by this chapter; or
(5) To make, distribute, or possess any punch, die, plate, stone, or other thing designed to
print, imprint, or reproduce the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, or device
of another or any likeness of any of these upon any drug or container or labeling of the drug or
container so as to render the drug a counterfeit substance.
LC000597 - Page 9 of 16

(b) Any person who violates this chapter is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than five (5) two (2) years, or fined not more than five thousand dollars
($5,000) two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both.
21-28-4.05. Prohibited acts E — False representations to obtain controlled substances.
(a) No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain a controlled substance or procure or attempt
to procure the administration of a controlled substance:
(1) By fraud, deceit, misrepresentation, or subterfuge;
(2) By the forgery or alteration of a prescription or of any written order;
(3) By the concealment of material fact; or
(4) By the use of a false name or the giving of a false address.
(b) Information communicated to a physician in an unlawful effort to procure the
administration of a controlled substance shall not be deemed a privileged communication.
(c) No person shall willfully make a false statement in any prescription, order, report, or
record, required by this chapter.
(d) No person shall, for the purpose of obtaining a controlled substance, falsely assume the
title of, or represent himself or herself to be, a manufacturer, wholesaler, practitioner, or other
authorized person.
(e) No person shall make or utter any false or forged prescription or false or forged written
order for controlled substances.
(f) No person shall affix any false or forged label to a package or receptacle containing
controlled substances.
(g) Any person who violates this section is guilty of a crime and upon conviction may be
imprisoned for not more than five (5) two (2) years, and fined not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both.
21-28-4.06. Prohibited acts F — Places used for unlawful sale, use, or keeping of
controlled substances.
(a) Any store, shop, warehouse, building, vehicle, aircraft, vessel, or any place which is
used for the unlawful sale, use, or keeping of a controlled substance shall be deemed a common
nuisance.
(b) Any person who violates this section with respect to:
(1) Knowingly keeping and maintaining a common nuisance as described in subsection (a)
may be imprisoned for not more than five (5) two (2) years, and fined not more than five thousand
dollars ($5,000) two thousand dollars ($2,000), or both;
(2) Knowingly permitting any store, shop, warehouse, building, vehicle, aircraft, vessel, or
LC000597 - Page 10 of 16

any place which is owned or controlled by him or her to be used as a common nuisance may be
imprisoned for not more than fifteen (15) four (4) years, and fined not more than twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000) five thousand dollars ($5,000), or both;
(3) Knowingly visiting a common nuisance as described in subsection (a) for the purpose
of using or taking in any manner any controlled substance may be imprisoned for not more than
one year six (6) months and fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).
21-28-4.09. General penalty clause.
Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, the penalty for which is not
specified in this chapter, and of the rules and regulations of the director of health made under
authority of this chapter, shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment of not more than one year
six (6) months, a fine of five hundred dollars ($500), or both.
21-28-4.11. Second offenses.
(a) Any person convicted of a second offense under this chapter, except for violations of §
21-28-4.01(c)(2)(i), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(v), or § 21-
28-4.01(c)(2)(vi), may be imprisoned for a term that may be increased by twenty-five percent
(25%) of up to twice the term authorized, fined an additional twenty-five percent (25%) of amount
up to twice that authorized, or both.
(b) For purposes of this section, an offense is considered a second offense if, prior to his or
her conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted under this chapter, except
for violations of § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(i), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv), § 21-28-
4.01(c)(2)(v), or § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi), or under any statute of the United States or of any state
relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, depressant, stimulant, or hallucinogenic drugs.
21-28-4.13. Impersonation of health officials — Penalties.
Every person who shall falsely assume or pretend to be the director of health or an officer,
agent, inspector, or representative designated by the director as having enforcement powers shall
be imprisoned not exceeding one year six (6) months and/or be fined not exceeding five hundred
dollars ($500).
21-28-4.14. Third or subsequent offenses.
(a) Any person convicted of a third or subsequent offense under this chapter, except for
violations of § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(v), or § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi), may be
imprisoned for a term that may be increased by fifty percent (50%) of up to three (3) times the
term authorized, and fined an additional fifty percent (50%) of amount up to three (3) times that
authorized by § 21-28-4.11, or both.
(b) For purposes of this section, an offense is considered a third or subsequent offense if,
LC000597 - Page 11 of 16

prior to his or her conviction of the offense, the offender has at any time been convicted twice under
this chapter, except for violations of § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iii), § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(iv), § 21-28-
4.01(c)(2)(v), or § 21-28-4.01(c)(2)(vi), or twice under any statute of the United States or of any
other state, or any combination of them, relating to narcotic drugs, marijuana, depressant, stimulant,
or hallucinogenic drugs.
21-28-4.15. Employment of person under age eighteen (18).
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person eighteen (18) years of age or older to hire, employ
or use any person under eighteen (18) years of age who is at least three (3) years his or her junior
to manufacture, transport, carry, sell, prepare for sale or offer for sale a controlled substance;
provided, that the provisions of this subsection shall not apply to individuals enrolled in a pharmacy
training program approved by the director.
(b) Any person who violates this section with respect to:
(1) A controlled substance classified in schedules I and II, except the substance classified
as marijuana, is guilty of a crime and upon conviction shall be imprisoned for not less more than
fifteen (15) ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for a term up to life and fined not more than five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) ten thousand dollars ($10,000). In all these cases, the justice
imposing sentence shall impose a minimum sentence of fifteen (15) years imprisonment and may
only impose a sentence less than that minimum if he or she finds that substantial and compelling
circumstances exist which justify imposition of the alternative sentence. The finding may be based
upon the character and background of the defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law
enforcement authorities, the nature and circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality
of the evidence presented at trial. If a sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of fifteen
(15) years is imposed, the trial justice shall set forth on the record the circumstances which he or
she found as justification for imposition of the lesser sentence;
(2) A controlled substance classified in schedule III or IV, is guilty of a crime and upon
conviction may be imprisoned for not more than twenty (20) five (5) years or fined not more than
forty thousand dollars ($40,000) five thousand dollars ($5,000) or both;
(3) A controlled substance classified in schedule V or marijuana, is guilty of a crime and
upon conviction may be imprisoned for not more than one year six (6) months or fined not more
than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) three thousand dollars ($3,000), or both.
21-28-4.18. Prohibited acts by law enforcement officials — Penalties.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any state or municipal law enforcement official, including
department of correction officers, state marshals, capital police, or other peace officers who are
empowered to enforce the provisions of this chapter, or any employee of a law enforcement agency
LC000597 - Page 12 of 16

to:
(1) Offer for sale or sell any information pertaining to an ongoing investigation conducted
by any law enforcement agency of a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter; or
(2) Use for any unauthorized purpose or sell or destroy or remove from unlawful custody
any of the evidence confiscated as a result of an arrest or seizure arising from the enforcement of
the provisions of this chapter.
(b) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a crime and upon conviction
shall be imprisoned not less than ten (10) years, and may be imprisoned for a term of up to twenty
(20) ten (10) years. In all these cases, the justice imposing sentence shall impose a minimum
sentence of ten (10) years imprisonment and may only impose a sentence less than that minimum
if he or she finds that substantial and compelling circumstances exist which justify imposition of
the alternative sentence. The finding may be based upon the character and background of the
defendant, the cooperation of the defendant with law enforcement authorities, the nature and
circumstances of the offense, and/or the nature and quality of the evidence presented at trial. If a
sentence which is less than imprisonment for a term of ten (10) years is imposed, the trial justice
shall set forth on the record the circumstances, which he or she found as justification for imposition
of the lesser sentence.
SECTION 2. Sections 21-28-4.07.1, 21-28-4.07.2, 21-28-4.16.1, 21-28-4.16.2, 21-28-4.17
and 21-28-4.17.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 21-28 entitled "Uniform Controlled Substances
Act" are hereby repealed.
21-28-4.07.1. Distribution or manufacturing in or near schools.
Any person who violates § 21-28-4.01(A), 21-28-4.01.1, or 21-28-4.07 by distributing or
manufacturing a controlled substance listed in schedules I or II in the building or on the grounds,
or within three hundred (300) yards of the grounds of a public or private elementary, vocational, or
secondary school, or public park or playground shall be punished by a term of imprisonment or
fine, or both, up to twice that authorized by § 21-28-4.01(A) or 21-28-4.07, but not exceeding life
imprisonment.
21-28-4.07.2. Distribution to individuals without knowledge — Crime of violence.
(a) Definitions: For the purposes of this section the following words shall have the
following definitions:
(1) “Crime of violence” means:
(i) An offense that has an element, the use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical
force against the person or property of another; or
(ii) Any other offense that is a felony and that, by its nature, involves a substantial risk that
LC000597 - Page 13 of 16

physical force against the person or property of another may be used in the course of committing
the offense.
(2) “Without that individual’s knowledge” means: that the individual is unaware that a
substance with the ability to alter that individual’s ability to appraise conduct, or to decline
participation in, or communicate unwillingness to participate in conduct, is administered to the
individual.
(b) Whoever, with the intent to commit a crime of violence against an individual, as defined
in this section and in chapter 11-37, violates this section by distributing a controlled substance, as
defined in § 21-28-1.02, or a controlled substance analogue to an individual without that
individual’s knowledge, shall be punished by a term of imprisonment not to exceed ten (10) years.
21-28-4.16.1. Larceny of a controlled substance.
Any person who steals or attempts to steal any controlled substance from a health care
facility, as defined in § 23-17-2, a licensed pharmacy, or any other lawful place of business, where
controlled substances are compounded, dispensed, administered, stored, or manufactured,
including common carriers, contract carriers, or any usual or lawful carrier, shall be punished by a
fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment of not more than ten (10)
years, or both.
21-28-4.16.2. Tampering with a controlled substance.
Any person who alters, tampers, substitutes, adulterates in any manner or form, the
compound, mixture, or preparation of any controlled substance in a health care facility, as defined
in § 23-17-2, shall be punished by a fine of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by
imprisonment of not more than ten (10) years, or both.
21-28-4.17. Additional assessment.
Should any person be convicted of or accept any plea bargain relating to an offense
involving the sale of a controlled substance, that person shall, in addition to any fine imposed, be
assessed an amount up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) by the court. The assessment shall be
transferred to the general treasury and deposited in the special account designated as the forfeited
property account. The funds may be used by law enforcement officials in accordance with the
requirements set forth in § 21-28-5.04.
21-28-4.17.1. Assessment for drug education, counseling and treatment.
Any person convicted of any offense under this article, other than the possession offenses
described in § 21-28-4.01(c), shall, in addition to any other sentence and/or fine imposed, be
assessed four hundred dollars ($400) by the court and the assessment shall be collected from the
person convicted before any other fines authorized by this chapter. The court shall not suspend any
LC000597 - Page 14 of 16

part or all of the imposition of the assessment required by this subsection, unless the court finds an
inability to pay. The assessment shall be deposited in the drug education, assessment and treatment
account to be used by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and
hospitals and the department of health for the purpose of administration, drug education, and
treatment.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000597
========
LC000597 - Page 15 of 16